src/verbLexcErz.lexc
! -*- utf-8-unix -*-
Multichar_Symbols

+Abe !
+Abl !
+Acronym !
+Ad-A !
+Adj !
+Adv !
+Adv_CEK !
+Adverbial !
+Adv_NEK !
+Allegro ! лома for ломань
+Anim ! Animate
+Anthroponym !
+AntiqLit ! antiquitated, used in modern Lit
+Artifact
+Assoc ! Associative
+Attr
+Capitalizing !
+Caus
+CEK
+Clan !
+ClitA
+ClitGa
+ClitGak
+ClitGaka
+ClitGakaya
+ClitGaya
+ClitGayaty
+ClitGayatya
+Clitic  !
+ClitKa
+ClitKaka
+ClitKakaya
+ClitKaya
+ClitKayaty
+ClitKayatya
+CltButi !
+Clt !Clitic
+CltGak !
+Cnt
+Com ! Comitative
+Comp !
+Cond !
+Conj !
+Conjunction !
+Conneg
+Count ! > +Cnt
+Cx
+Dat !
+DatDefSg
+Default/1
+Default/2
+DefSg
+Deict ! Deictic
+Dem ! Demonstrative
+Deriv !
+Der/кс
+Der/це +Der/се ! Determinate marker
+Des !
+Det  !
+DetArt ! Determinate article "-се"
+Deverbal !
+Dial !
+DimK !
+DimKA !
+DimKE !
+DimKINE !
+DimKO !
+DimNE !
+DimNYKA !
+Dog
+Ela !
+Emphatic
+Erz !Erzya or Erzya-like
+Familiar !
+First !
+FirstF !
+FirstM !
+ForeignNew
+ForeignOld
+Gen !
+GenDefSg
+GenIndef
+GenPrt  !
+Ger ! Gerund ZY
+Gr2000
+Homestead
+Ideophone !
+Ill !
+Imp !
+Inanim !
+Inch
+Ind !
+Indef !
+IndefNomPl
+IndefNomSg
+Indet !Is this necessary?
+IndNonpast1Pl
+IndNonpast1Sg
+IndNonpast2Pl
+IndNonpast2Sg
+IndNonpast3Pl
+IndNonpast3Sg
+IndPretI
+IndPretII
+Ine !
+Interj ! Interjection
+Iter ! Iterative (number)
+Kin
+KLoss !
+Last !
+LastF !
+LastM !
+Lat !lative
+Loc !
+LVStem ! used with +N2I and +N2U "stem vowel"
+LV !+VowX !alternates with +NoVowX
+Manner !
+Mdf !Moksha
+mdOInf  !
+mgaInf  !
+mksInf  !
+Mod ! Modal
+mOInf  !
+msInf  !
+mstOInf  !
+MVme !Main verb "mo" vs "me"
+NCnt !
+NCom ! common noun
+NConsStem !
+Neg !
+NMixedStem !
+NoClitic
+NoClitic !
+NoLV !+NoVowX !No linking with suffix.
+NoLVStem ! used with +N2I and +N2U "no stem vowel"
+Nom !
+NomDefSg
+NomGen ! both nominative and genitive usage
+Noncount ! >> +NCnt
+NonNomSg !
+Nonpast
+NoNum ! No number
+NoPossPx !
+NoPredx !
+Noun !
+Noun2 !
NoVLoss
+NPrp ! proper noun
+NVowStem !
+N1 ! noun type 1
+N1S ! noun type 1S
+N2I
+N2 ! noun type 2
+N2U
+N3 ! noun type 3
+Obj !
+ObjOpen ! available for object conjugation
+ObjX  !
+Oblig !
+OldOrth !
+Opt !
+OptVow ! Optional with type 2 nominals
+Orth_dial
+Orth_erz
+Orth_familiar
+Orth_folksy
+Orth_hyphen
+Orth_Kozl
+Orth_morph
+OrthMorph
+Orth_old
+OrthOld
+Orth_phon
+OrthPhon
+Orth_ru
+Orth_vHarm ! unexpected vowel harmony: Тенгушень
+Particle !>> +Prt
+PatronymF !
+PatronymM !
+PerifMod ! Periferal modifier
+Pl !
+PlDefPl
+PlDefPlNom
+Poss !
+Poss1Pl !
+Poss1Sg !
+Poss1Sg/м !
+Poss1Sg/Н !
+Poss2Pl !
+Poss2Sg !
+Poss3Pl !
+Poss3Sg !
+Poss3 ! this is dative marker "О1нстэнь"
+Postp !
+Pred !
+Pres !
+PresPrtLong !:^Ы2ця Nouns1
+PresPrtMedium !:^Ы2й Nouns1
+PresPrtShort !:^Ы2 Nouns1
+PretI  !
+PretII !
+Prol !
+Pron !
+Pronoun ! This should be convertedt to "+Pron"
+Proper ! >> +NPrp
+Prt !Particle
+Ptc !Participle
+Q ! Quantifier
+Quant ! >> +Q
+Sandhi ! set in compound words
+Settlement !
+Sg !
+SOD !speaker-oriented deictic marker
+Spatial !
+Spat4
+State ! Adverb expressing State "кепе, озадо"
+Subj !
+SubS ! Substandard
+SurnameM
+Telic
+Temporal !Case name
+Temp !Property of Durativity attributed to noun, e.g. "rain", "day"
+TLoss
+Toponym !
+Transl !
+VConsStem !
+Verb  !
VLoss
+Vocat !
+VoicingCons !
+VTStem !
+VVowStem !
+V1 ! verb type 1
+V1VI
+V1VU
+V2
+V2Adj !
+V2Nma !Deverbal Noun in "mo" and "ma"
+V2 ! verb type 2
+V3 ! verb type 3
+Wife !
+ZeroSuf
+ZPrt !
А1
А2
Г1
Г2
И1
И2
И3
К1
К2
К3
О1
Т1
У1
У2
У3
У4
Ы1
Ы2
Ы3
+1 !
+1Pl !
+1Pl/3
+1Sg !
+1SgM !
+1SgN !
+1Sg/2Sg
+1Sg/3Pl
+1Sg/3Sg
+2 !
+2Pl !
+2Pl/3
+2Sg !
+2Sg/1Sg
+2Sg/3Pl
+2Sg/3Sg
+20
+3Pl !
+3Pl/3
+3Sg !
+3Sg/1Sg
+3Sg/2Sg
+3Sg/3Pl
+3Sg/3Sg



! Flags
@P.BUTI.ON@
@R.BUTI.ON@
@D.BUTI.ON@
@C.BUTI@

@P.CONJ.ObjAll@
@R.CONJ.ObjAll@
@C.CONJ@

@P.KLOSS.ON@
@R.KLOSS.ON@
@C.KLOSS@

@P.LV.ON@
@P.LV.OFF@
@D.LV.ON@
@C.LV@

@P.NUM.SG@
@P.NUM.PL@
@D.NUM.SG@
@D.NUM.PL@
@C.NUM@

@P.TLOSS.ON@
@R.TLOSS.ON@
@C.TLOSS@


LEXICON CondVerbs
+Deriv+Cond+Conj:^Ы2ндеря Conjunctive2 ;
+Deriv+Cond:^Ы2ндеря Indicative1 ;
+Deriv+Cond+IndNopast3Sg:^Ы2ндеряй Clitics ;
+Deriv+Cond+IndNonpast3Pl:^Ы2ндеряйть Clitics ;

LEXICON Verbs1T_ObjAll
< %+ObjOpen:0 "@P.TLOSS.ON@"  "@P.CONJ.ObjAll@"> Verbs1_ObjAll;

LEXICON Verbs1_ObjAll
< %+ObjOpen:0 "@P.CONJ.ObjAll@"> Verbs1 ;

LEXICON Verbs1VI_ObjAll
< %+ObjOpen:0 "@P.CONJ.ObjAll@"> Verbs1VI ;

LEXICON Verbs1VU_ObjAll
< %+ObjOpen:0 "@P.CONJ.ObjAll@"> Verbs1VU ;

LEXICON Verbs2_ObjAll
< %+ObjOpen:0 "@P.CONJ.ObjAll@"> Verbs2 ;

LEXICON Verbs3_ObjAll
< %+ObjOpen:0 "@P.CONJ.ObjAll@"> Verbs3 ;


LEXICON Verbs1T
 Verbs1 ;

LEXICON Verbs1
+V1: Verbs1-a ;
+V1:     VerbsPresPrt_1 ;
+V1+Cond:^Ы2ндеря   VerbsPresPrt_1 ;
+V1+Cond:^Ы2ндеря   Deverbals_2 ;
+V1: Deverbals_1_ReqVow ;
+V1: Deverbals_1_NoReqVow ;
+V1+LV+Conneg:^О1К3 Tenses1 ;


LEXICON Verbs1-a
<"@C.TLOSS@"> CondVerbs ;
+Conj: Conjunctive1 ;
+Des: Desiderative1 ;
 Indicative1 ;
+IndPretII: IndicativePretII_1 ;
+Imp: Imperative1 ;
+Opt: Optative1 ;

LEXICON Verbs1VI
+V1VI: Verbs1VI-a ;
+V1VI:вИ1     VerbsPresPrt_1 ;
+V1VI+Cond:вИ1^Ы2ндеря   VerbsPresPrt_1 ;
+V1VI+Cond:вИ1^Ы2ндеря   Deverbals_2 ;
+V1VI:вИ1  Deverbals_1_ReqVow ;
+V1VI:вИ1  Deverbals_1_NoReqVow ;
+V1VI+LV+Conneg:вИ1^О1К3 Tenses1 ;


LEXICON Verbs1VI-a
:вИ1 CondVerbs ;
+Conj: Conjunctive2 ;
+Conj+Dial:вИ1 Conjunctive1 ;
+Des:вИ1 Desiderative1 ;
:вИ1 Indicative1 ;
+IndPretII:вИ1 IndicativePretII_1 ;
+Imp:вИ1 Imperative1 ;
+Opt:вИ1 Optative1 ;

LEXICON Verbs1VU
+V1VU: Verbs1VU-a ;
+V1VU:вУ1     VerbsPresPrt_1 ;
+V1VU+Cond:вУ1^Ы2ндеря   VerbsPresPrt_1 ;
+V1VU+Cond:вУ1^Ы2ндеря   Deverbals_2 ;
+V1VU:вУ1 Deverbals_1_ReqVow ;
+V1VU:вУ1 Deverbals_1_NoReqVow ;
+V1VU+LV+Conneg:вУ1^О1К3 Tenses1 ;


LEXICON Verbs1VU-a
:вУ1 CondVerbs ;
+Conj: Conjunctive2 ;
+Conj+Dial:вУ1 Conjunctive1 ;
+Des:вУ1 Desiderative1 ;
:вУ1 Indicative1 ;
+IndPretII:вУ1 IndicativePretII_1 ;
+Imp:вУ1 Imperative1 ;
+Opt:вУ1 Optative1 ;

LEXICON Verbs2
+V2: Verbs2-a ;
+V2:     VerbsPresPrt_1 ;
+V2+Cond:^Ы2ндеря   VerbsPresPrt_1 ;
+V2+Cond:^Ы2ндеря   Deverbals_2 ;
+V2+NoLV:  Deverbals_2 ; !This denies linking vowel


LEXICON Verbs2-a
 CondVerbs ;
+Conj: Conjunctive2 ;
+Des: Desiderative2 ;
 Indicative1 ;
+IndPretII: IndicativePretII_2 ;
+Imp: Imperative2 ;
+Opt: Optative1 ;


LEXICON Verbs3
+V3: Verbs3-a ;
+V3:     VerbsPresPrt_1 ;
+V3+Cond:^Ы2ндеря   VerbsPresPrt_1 ;
+V3+Cond:^Ы2ндеря   Deverbals_2 ;
+V3+NoLV:  Deverbals_2 ; !This denies linking vowel


LEXICON Verbs3-a
 CondVerbs ;
+Conj: Conjunctive2 ;
+Des: Desiderative2 ;
 Indicative1 ;
+IndPretII: IndicativePretII_2 ;
+Imp: Imperative2 ;
+Opt: Optative1 ;

LEXICON Indicative1
+IndPretI: IndicativePretI-plus ;
!Indicative Non-past
+IndNonpast1Sg:^А2н Clitics ;
+IndNonpast2Sg:^А2т Clitics ;
+IndNonpast3Sg:^Ы2 Clitics ;
+IndNonpast1Pl:^тА2но Clitics ;
+Dial+IndNonpast1Pl:^тА2м Clitics ;
+Kozl+IndNonpast1Pl:^тА2нок Clitics ;
+IndNonpast2Pl:^тА2до Clitics ;
+IndNonpast3Pl:^Ы2ть Clitics ;
! Indicative Preterite I
+IndPretI+3Sg:^сь Clitics ;
+IndPretI+3Pl:^сть Clitics ;
<"@R.CONJ.ObjAll@"> Indicative_Present_Obj ;
< %+TLoss:0 "@R.TLOSS.ON@"> Indicative_Present_TLoss ;

LEXICON Indicative_Present_TLoss
+IndNonpast1Pl:^А2но Clitics ;
+Dial+IndNonpast1Pl:^А2м Clitics ;
+Kozl+IndNonpast1Pl:^А2нок Clitics ;
+IndNonpast2Pl:^А2до Clitics ;

LEXICON Indicative_Present_Obj

+IndNonpast1Sg/2Sg:^тА2н Clitics ;
+IndNonpast1Sg/3Sg:^са Clitics ;
+Dial+IndNonpast1Sg/3Sg:^сан Clitics ;
+Dial+IndNonpast1Sg/3Sg:^сать Clitics ;
+IndNonpast1Sg/3Pl:^сынь Clitics ;
+IndNonpast2Sg/1Sg:^самак Clitics ;
+IndNonpast2Sg/3Sg:^сак Clitics ;
+IndNonpast2Sg/3Pl:^сыть Clitics ;
+IndNonpast3Sg/1Sg:^самам Clitics ;
+IndNonpast3Sg/2Sg:^тА2нзат Clitics ;
+IndNonpast3Sg/3Sg:^сы Clitics ;
+Dial+IndNonpast3Sg/3Sg:^сазо Clitics ;
+IndNonpast3Sg/3Pl:^сынзе Clitics ;
+IndNonpast1Pl/3:^сынек Clitics ;
+IndNonpast2Pl/3:^сынк Clitics ;
+IndNonpast3Pl/3:^сызь Clitics ;
+IndNonpastObj1:^самизь Clitics ;
+IndNonpastObj2:^тА2дызь Clitics ;
< %+TLoss:0 "@R.TLOSS.ON@"> Indicative_Present_Obj_TLoss ;

LEXICON Root
амамс+Verb:ама Verbs2 ;
бизмолдомс+Verb:бизмолдУ1 Verbs1 ;
бомбакшномс+Verb:бомбакшно Verbs2_ObjAll ;
бронировамс+Verb:бронирова Verbs2 ;
буйкстазевемс+Verb+Inch:буйкстазе Verbs1VI ;
буряськавтомс+Verb:буряськавтУ1 Verbs1T_ObjAll ;
бухадемс+Verb:бухадИ1 Verbs1_ObjAll ;
вадновомс+Verb+Telic:вадно Verbs1VU ;
валськемемс+Verb:валськемИ1 Verbs1 ;
вармаськафтомс+Verb:вармаськафтУ1 Verbs1T ;
васодемс+Verb:васодИ1 Verbs1_ObjAll ;
венстекшнэмс+Verb:венстекшнэ Verbs2_ObjAll ;
видькставтомс+Verb+Caus:видькставтУ1 Verbs1T_ObjAll ;
витетекшнемс+Verb:витетекшне Verbs2 ;
выжнэвемс+Verb:выжнэ Verbs1VI ;
гагакстовомс+Verb:гагаксто Verbs1VU ;
дёргадемс+Verb:дёргадИ1 Verbs1_ObjAll ;
дивавкстомс+Verb:дивавкстУ1 Verbs1T ;
дохадемс+Verb:дохадИ1 Verbs1 ;
думакшномс+Verb:думакшно Verbs2_ObjAll ;
ёлдордокшномс+Verb:ёлдордокшно Verbs2 ;
ёмавтомс+Verb:ёмавтоТ1 Verbs3 ;
ёртневемс+Verb+Telic:ёртне Verbs1VI ;
жольневтемс+Verb:жольневтИ1 Verbs1T_ObjAll ;
икельдявомс+Verb+Telic:икельдя Verbs1VU ;
икнетемс+Verb:икнетеТ1 Verbs3 ;
кабзордомс+Verb:кабзордУ1 Verbs1_ObjAll ;
кайсевкшнемс+Verb:кайсевкшне Verbs2 ;
кайсевтнемс+Verb:кайсевтне Verbs2_ObjAll ;
калцкаевемс+Verb+Telic:калцкае Verbs1VI ;
канкськадомс+Verb:канкськадУ1 Verbs1 ;
каявтомс+Verb+Caus:каявтУ1 Verbs1T_ObjAll ;
келявомс+Verb:келя Verbs1VU ;
кенгелякшномс+Verb:кенгелякшно Verbs2_ObjAll ;
кепедемс+Verb:кепедИ1 Verbs1_ObjAll ;
кепсетемс+Verb:кепсетеТ1 Verbs3 ;
кецязевемс+Verb+Inch:кецязе Verbs1VI ;
кирдевкшнэмс+Verb:кирдевкшнэ Verbs2 ;
кирякстомс+Verb:кирякстУ1 Verbs1T ;
конштнемс+Verb:конштне Verbs2_ObjAll ;
копорявтомс+Verb:копорявтУ1 Verbs1T_ObjAll ;
кортнезевемс+Verb+Inch:кортнезе Verbs1VI ;
кроявомс+Verb:кроя Verbs1VU ;
кумбодомс+Verb:кумбодУ1 Verbs1 ;
кундатокшномс+Verb:кундатокшно Verbs2 ;
куродомс+Verb:куродУ1 Verbs1_ObjAll ;
курякстомс+Verb:курякстУ1 Verbs1T ;
ладятомс+Verb:ладятоТ1 Verbs3 ;
лайшекшнемс+Verb:лайшекшне Verbs2_ObjAll ;
левшиявтомс+Verb:левшиявтУ1 Verbs1T_ObjAll ;
ливемс+Verb:ли Verbs1VI_ObjAll ;
ливтитемс+Verb:ливтитеТ1 Verbs3 ;
лондадовомс+Verb:лондадо Verbs1VU ;
лондадстомс+Verb:лондадстУ1 Verbs1T ;
лукштядемс+Verb:лукштядИ1 Verbs1_ObjAll ;
макснемс+Verb:максне Verbs2_ObjAll ;
малавгадомс+Verb:малавгадУ1 Verbs1 ;
матратомс+Verb:матратоТ1 Verbs3 ;
мендявтомс+Verb:мендявтУ1 Verbs1T_ObjAll ;
меревемс+Verb+Telic:мере Verbs1VI ;
муськемс+Verb:муськИ1 Verbs1_ObjAll ;
навтамс+Verb:навта Verbs2_ObjAll ;
налкафтомс+Verb:налкафтУ1 Verbs1T ;
напандямс+Verb:напандя Verbs2 ;
неволявомс+Verb:неволя Verbs1VU ;
ноцордомс+Verb:ноцордУ1 Verbs1_ObjAll ;
нуртямс+Verb:нуртя Verbs2_ObjAll ;
нурьгевтемс+Verb:нурьгевтИ1 Verbs1T_ObjAll ;
оргатемс+Verb:оргатеТ1 Verbs3 ;
паковавомс+Verb:пакова Verbs1VU ;
пежекстэмс+Verb:пежекстЫ1 Verbs1T ;
пекадемс+Verb:пекадИ1 Verbs1 ;
пенгедевемс+Verb:пенгеде Verbs1VI ;
пенгедемс+Verb:пенгедИ1 Verbs1_ObjAll ;
пивтемс+Verb+Caus:пивтИ1 Verbs1T_ObjAll ;
пиштемс+Verb:пиштИ1 Verbs1T ;
польдердекшнемс+Verb:польдердекшне Verbs2 ;
правтокшномс+Verb:правтокшно Verbs2_ObjAll ;
пувантемс+Verb:пувантеТ1 Verbs3 ;
раздевтемс+Verb+Caus:раздевтИ1 Verbs1T_ObjAll ;
рямштядимс+Verb:рямштядИ1 Verbs1 ;
савтовомс+Verb+Telic:савто Verbs1VU ;
сатомс+Verb:сатоТ1 Verbs3 ;
сезтемс+Verb:сезтИ1 Verbs1T ;
симдемс+Verb:симдИ1 Verbs1_ObjAll ;
сингирдамс+Verb:сингирда Verbs2 ;
скокадевемс+Verb:скокаде Verbs1VI ;
таргатомс+Verb:таргатоТ1 Verbs3_ObjAll ;
таштомомс+Verb:таштомУ1 Verbs1 ;
телешавтомс+Verb:телешавтУ1 Verbs1T_ObjAll ;
тердекшнэмс+Verb:тердекшнэ Verbs2_ObjAll ;
толотемс+Verb:толотеТ1 Verbs3 ;
тормозякшномс+Verb:тормозякшно Verbs2 ;
тулодовомс+Verb:тулодо Verbs1VU ;
тыцкофтомс+Verb:тыцкофтУ1 Verbs1T ;
хропадемс+Verb:хропадИ1 Verbs1_ObjAll ;
цападевемс+Verb:цападе Verbs1VI ;
цёцякадомс+Verb:цёцякадУ1 Verbs1 ;
чемениямс+Verb:чемения Verbs2 ;
чилгадомс+Verb:чилгадУ1 Verbs1 ;
чождынгавтомс+Verb:чождынгавтУ1 Verbs1T_ObjAll ;
чопотемс+Verb:чопотеТ1 Verbs3 ;
чувомс+Verb+Telic:чу Verbs1VU_ObjAll ;
шлёпадевемс+Verb:шлёпаде Verbs1VI ;
экшендявомс+Verb+Telic:экшендя Verbs1VU ;
юхатемс+Verb:юхатИ1 Verbs1T ;
